Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 29A.04 RCW to read as follows:The secretary of state shall create and administer a grant program to purchase and install cameras around ballot drop boxes. Only county auditors and elections directors are eligible for this grant program. Grant funds must only be used for the purchase, installation, or connection of cameras at ballot drop boxes. Grant funds may not be used for ongoing operational costs for cameras.--- END ---